Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Reports to Legislative Research Commission

42.600.
Report of Court of Justice as to collections.

The Court of Justice shall make a report according to generally accepted accounting principles of all money received and disbursed pursuant to fines, court costs, or fees established by enactment of the General Assembly, showing the receipts, expenditures, depositories, rates of interest paid by depositories, investments, and rates of return on investments by each fund to the Legislative Research Commission for each fiscal year on or before the 15th of July.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 16, effective July 15, 1982.

42.605.
Reports of Court of Justice concerning money judgments.

The Court of Justice shall make a report according to generally accepted accounting principles of all money received and disbursed pursuant to any action based on a cause of action established by enactment of the General Assembly, showing the receipts, expenditures, depositories, rates of interest paid by depositories, investments, and rates of return on investments by each fund to the Legislative Research Commission for each fiscal year on or before the 15th of July.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 17, effective July 15, 1982.

42.610.
Reports to be similar in form.

The Legislative Research Commission shall, by regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, require reports by the Court of Justice, under KRS

42.600

and

42.605

, to be substantially similar in form to the reports made to the State Investment Commission under KRS

42.535

to

42.550

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 18, effective July 15, 1982.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(10/5/90). Pursuant to KRS 7.136(1), KRS Chapter 13A has been substituted for the prior reference to KRS Chapter 13 in this statute. The sections in KRS Chapter 13 were repealed by 1984 Ky. Acts ch. 417, § 36 and KRS Chapter 13A was created in that same chapter of the 1984 Ky. Acts.

42.615.
Annual reports of retirement funds.

Each retirement fund listed in this section shall make a report according to generally accepted accounting principles of all money received and disbursed by the listed fund during each fiscal year on or before the first day of October after the fiscal year, showing receipts, expenditures, depositories, rates of interest paid by depositories, investments, and rates of return on investments by each listed fund to the Legislative Research Commission. The funds which shall be reported are:

Kentucky employees’ retirement fund;

State Police retirement fund;

County employees’ retirement fund;

Kentucky retirement systems insurance fund;

Funds controlled by the Teachers’ Retirement System of the State of Kentucky;

Judicial retirement fund;

Legislators retirement fund; and

The Kentucky state public employees deferred compensation trust fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 19, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 77, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.